Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2225.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; Yavapai county; northern Arizona regional training academy; exemption A. The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer to distribute to Yavapai county for capital costs for a northern Arizona regional training academy. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations, until June 30, 2029.